District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1715

Regulations for posting prices of services; fine for violation of regulations

Repealed.

History

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245, § 38(a), 40 DCR 660

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-401 to 2-419.